Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-520.03
Land-management burning; fire chief of local fire department; designate member of department; share powers and duties.

The fire chief of a local fire department may designate a member of the local fire department to share the powers and duties of the fire chief under sections 81-520.01 to 81-520.05, except adopting standards pursuant to subsection (4) of section 81-520.01.

Laws 1994, LB 408, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB248, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB823, § 2.
July 18, 2026